Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Article 3. Department of Audit.

§ 7-7-201.
Department of audit created.

A department of audit is hereby established under the supervision of the State Auditor. He shall exercise such powers and perform such duties incident to the organization and function of the department as are set forth in the subsequent sections of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 1; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 7-7-202.
Offices of department; office hours; official seal.

The State Auditor shall keep the office of the department at the seat of the government and shall keep it open Monday through Friday of each week for at least eight (8) hours each day. The State Auditor may establish satellite offices at other locations in the state. The State Auditor is authorized to prepare and use an official seal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 7-7-203.
State Auditor to appoint director for financial and compliance division, director for investigations division and other employees as necessary to carry out duties of auditor.

The State Auditor shall appoint a director for the financial and compliance division and a director for the investigations division of the department. The director of the financial and compliance division shall be a certified public accountant of recognized executive ability and thoroughly familiar with the laws of the state in relation to the financial administration of the public offices thereof. The director of the investigations division shall be a certified law enforcement officer of recognized executive ability and shall be thoroughly familiar with the laws of the state in relation to the financial administration of the public offices thereof.

The State Auditor may appoint deputy auditors; employ attorneys, certified public accountants and other assistants; or contract for any services necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 2; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 545, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2013.

§ 7-7-204.
Paid internship program for certain students working toward a bachelor’s or master’s degree in accounting; eligibility requirements; liability of recipients who fail to complete coursework or degree or fail to work as auditor at Office of State Auditor for requisite period of time.

Within the limits of the funds available to the Office of the State Auditor for such purpose, the State Auditor may grant a paid internship to students pursuing junior or senior undergraduate-level year coursework toward a bachelor’s degree in accounting or graduate-level coursework toward a master’s degree in accounting. Those applicants deemed qualified shall receive funds that may be used to pay for tuition, books and related fees to pursue their degree. It is the intent of the Legislature that the paid internship program (hereinafter referred to as the program) shall be used as an incentive for accounting students to develop job-related skills and to encourage accounting careers at the Office of the State Auditor.

In order to be eligible for the program, an applicant must:

Attend any college or school approved and designated by the Office of the State Auditor.

Satisfy the following conditions:

Applicants must have achieved a minimum Grade Point Average (GPA) on the previously obtained semester hours toward a bachelor of science degree in accounting of 3.0 on a 4.0 scale.

If accepted into the program, participants shall maintain a minimum cumulative GPA of 3.0 on a 4.0 scale in all coursework counted toward a bachelor of science degree in accounting.

Undergraduate stipulations: Applicants must have successfully obtained a minimum of fifty-eight (58) semester hours toward a bachelor of science degree in accounting from a Mississippi institution of higher learning.

Graduate stipulations: Applicants must have met the regular admission standards and have been accepted into the master of science accounting program at a Mississippi institution of higher learning.

If accepted into the program, participants shall maintain a minimum cumulative GPA of 3.0 on a 4.0 scale in all coursework counted toward a master of science degree in accounting.

All program participants will be required to work a total of three hundred thirty-six (336) hours each summer at the Office of the State Auditor in Jackson, Mississippi.

Agree to work as an auditor at the Office of the State Auditor upon graduation for a period of time equivalent to the period of time for which the applicant receives compensation, calculated to the nearest whole month, but in no event less than two (2) years.

Before being placed into the program, each applicant shall enter into a contract with the Office of the State Auditor, which shall be deemed a contract with the State of Mississippi, agreeing to the terms and conditions upon which the internship shall be granted to him. The contract shall include such terms and provisions necessary to carry out the full purpose and intent of this section. The form of such contract shall be prepared and approved by the Attorney General of this state, and shall be signed by the State Auditor of the Office of the State Auditor and the participant.

Upon entry into the program, participants will become employees of the Office of the State Auditor during their time in the program and shall be eligible for benefits such as medical insurance paid by the agency for the participant; however, in accordance with Section 25-11-105II(b), those participants shall not become members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System while participating in the program. Participants shall not accrue personal or major medical leave while they are in the program.

The Office of the State Auditor shall have the authority to cancel any contract made between it and any program participant upon such cause being deemed sufficient by the State Auditor.

The Office of the State Auditor is vested with full and complete authority and power to sue in its own name any participant for any damages due the state on any such uncompleted contract, which suit shall be filed and handled by the Attorney General of the state. The Office of the State Auditor may contract with a collection agency or banking institution, subject to approval by the Attorney General, for collection of any damages due the state from any participant. The State of Mississippi, the Office of the State Auditor and its employees are immune from any suit brought in law or equity for actions taken by the collection agency or banking institution incidental to or arising from their performance under the contract. The Office of the State Auditor, collection agency and banking institution may negotiate for the payment of a sum that is less than full payment in order to satisfy any damages the participant owes the state, subject to approval by the director of the sponsoring facility within the Office of the State Auditor.

Any recipient who is accepted into the program by the Mississippi Office of the State Auditor and who fails to complete undergraduate- or graduate-level coursework toward a degree in accounting, or withdraws from school at any time before completing his or her education, shall be liable to repay the Office of the State Auditor for all monies received during the time the recipient was in the program, at the rate of pay received by the employee while in the program, including benefits paid by the agency for the participant, and monies received for tuition, books and related fees used to pursue their degree with interest accruing at ten percent (10%) per annum from the date the recipient failed or withdrew from school. The recipient also will not be liable for repayment for any money earned during the required summer hours. This money shall be considered earned by the recipient at the federal minimum wage rate.

All paid internship compensation received by the recipient while in school shall be considered earned conditioned upon the fulfillment of the terms and obligations of the paid internship contract and this section. However, no recipient of the paid internship shall accrue personal or major medical leave while the recipient is pursuing junior or senior undergraduate-level year coursework toward a bachelor’s degree in accounting or graduate-level coursework toward a master’s degree in accounting. The recipient shall not be liable for liquidated damages.

If the recipient does not work as an auditor at the Office of the State Auditor for the period required under subsection (2)(d) of this section, the recipient shall be liable for repayment on demand of the remaining portion of the compensation that the recipient was paid while in the program which has not been unconditionally earned, with interest accruing at ten percent (10%) per annum from the recipient’s date of graduation or the date that the recipient last worked at the Office of the State Auditor, whichever is the later date. In addition, there shall be included in any contract for paid student internship a provision for liquidated damages equal to Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) which may be reduced on a pro rata basis for each year served under such contract.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 558, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009).

§ 7-7-205.
Surety bonds required.

The director, the assistant director, and all accountants and auditors of the department shall be required to execute surety bonds in such amounts as the state auditor may deem sufficient to ensure faithful performance of duties and financial accountability, provided the amount of such bond of the director shall not be less than Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00). The costs of such bonds shall be paid out of the department of audit fund in the same manner as other expenses are paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 8; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 8.

§ 7-7-207.
Compensation of director.

The director of the department shall receive compensation as set by the state auditor which shall not exceed the salary of the state auditor as fixed by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-03; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 3; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 3; Laws, 1958, ch. 322; Laws, 1966, ch. 445, § 5; Laws, 1970, ch. 469, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 512, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 7-7-209.
Travel and other expenses.

The state auditor, director, and all employees of the department required to travel in the performance of official duties shall be reimbursed for actual subsistence and transportation expenses incurred by them while traveling away from home, as provided by law. The office of the department shall be supplied with all necessary supplies, stationery, printing, furniture, and equipment, which shall be purchased at the lowest and best prices obtainable. All salaries, travel, and other expenses of the department, including costs of purchases as aforesaid, shall be paid monthly out of the state department of audit fund, upon requisitions or vouchers approved by the director or, in his absence, by the assistant director.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 4; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 4.

§ 7-7-211.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall have the power and it shall be its duty:

To identify and define for all public offices of the state and its subdivisions generally accepted accounting principles or other accounting principles as promulgated by nationally recognized professional organizations and to consult with the State Fiscal Officer in the prescription and implementation of accounting rules and regulations;

To provide best practices, for all public offices of regional and local subdivisions of the state, systems of accounting, budgeting and reporting financial facts relating to said offices in conformity with legal requirements and with generally accepted accounting principles or other accounting principles as promulgated by nationally recognized professional organizations; to assist such subdivisions in need of assistance in the installation of such systems; to revise such systems when deemed necessary, and to report to the Legislature at periodic times the extent to which each office is maintaining such systems, along with such recommendations to the Legislature for improvement as seem desirable;

To study and analyze existing managerial policies, methods, procedures, duties and services of the various state departments and institutions upon written request of the Governor, the Legislature or any committee or other body empowered by the Legislature to make such request to determine whether and where operations can be eliminated, combined, simplified and improved;

To postaudit each year and, when deemed necessary, preaudit and investigate the financial affairs of the departments, institutions, boards, commissions, or other agencies of state government, as part of the publication of a comprehensive annual financial report for the State of Mississippi, or as deemed necessary by the State Auditor. In complying with the requirements of this paragraph, the department shall have the authority to conduct all necessary audit procedures on an interim and year-end basis;

To postaudit and, when deemed necessary, preaudit and investigate separately the financial affairs of (i) the offices, boards and commissions of county governments and any departments and institutions thereof and therein; (ii) public school districts, departments of education and junior college districts; and (iii) any other local offices or agencies which share revenues derived from taxes or fees imposed by the State Legislature or receive grants from revenues collected by governmental divisions of the state; the cost of such audits, investigations or other services to be paid as follows: Such part shall be paid by the state from appropriations made by the Legislature for the operation of the State Department of Audit as may exceed the sum of Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per man-hour for the services of each staff person engaged in performing the audit or other service plus the actual cost of any independent specialist firm contracted by the State Auditor to assist in the performance of the audit, which sum shall be paid by the county, district, department, institution or other agency audited out of its general fund or any other available funds from which such payment is not prohibited by law. Costs paid for independent specialists or firms contracted by the State Auditor shall be paid by the audited entity through the State Auditor to the specialist or firm conducting the postaudit.

Each school district in the state shall have its financial records audited annually, at the end of each fiscal year, either by the State Auditor or by a certified public accountant approved by the State Auditor. Beginning with the audits of fiscal year 2010 activity, no certified public accountant shall be selected to perform the annual audit of a school district who has audited that district for three (3) or more consecutive years previously. Certified public accountants shall be selected in a manner determined by the State Auditor. The school district shall have the responsibility to pay for the audit, including the review by the State Auditor of audits performed by certified public accountants;

To postaudit and, when deemed necessary, preaudit and investigate the financial affairs of the levee boards; agencies created by the Legislature or by executive order of the Governor; profit or nonprofit business entities administering programs financed by funds flowing through the State Treasury or through any of the agencies of the state, or its subdivisions; and all other public bodies supported by funds derived in part or wholly from public funds, except municipalities which annually submit an audit prepared by a qualified certified public accountant using methods and procedures prescribed by the department;

To make written demand, when necessary, for the recovery of any amounts representing public funds improperly withheld, misappropriated and/or otherwise illegally expended by an officer, employee or administrative body of any state, county or other public office, and/or for the recovery of the value of any public property disposed of in an unlawful manner by a public officer, employee or administrative body, such demands to be made (i) upon the person or persons liable for such amounts and upon the surety on official bond thereof, and/or (ii) upon any individual, partnership, corporation or association to whom the illegal expenditure was made or with whom the unlawful disposition of public property was made, if such individual, partnership, corporation or association knew or had reason to know through the exercising of reasonable diligence that the expenditure was illegal or the disposition unlawful. Such demand shall be premised on competent evidence, which shall include at least one (1) of the following: (i) sworn statements, (ii) written documentation, (iii) physical evidence, or (iv) reports and findings of government or other law enforcement agencies. Other provisions notwithstanding, a demand letter issued pursuant to this paragraph shall remain confidential by the State Auditor until the individual against whom the demand letter is being filed has been served with a copy of such demand letter. If, however, such individual cannot be notified within fifteen (15) days using reasonable means and due diligence, such notification shall be made to the individual’s bonding company, if he or she is bonded. Each such demand shall be paid into the proper treasury of the state, county or other public body through the office of the department in the amount demanded within thirty (30) days from the date thereof, together with interest thereon in the sum of one percent (1%) per month from the date such amount or amounts were improperly withheld, misappropriated and/or otherwise illegally expended. In the event, however, such person or persons or such surety shall refuse, neglect or otherwise fail to pay the amount demanded and the interest due thereon within the allotted thirty (30) days, the State Auditor shall have the authority and it shall be his duty to institute suit, and the Attorney General shall prosecute the same in any court of the state to the end that there shall be recovered the total of such amounts from the person or persons and surety on official bond named therein; and the amounts so recovered shall be paid into the proper treasury of the state, county or other public body through the State Auditor. In any case where written demand is issued to a surety on the official bond of such person or persons and the surety refuses, neglects or otherwise fails within one hundred twenty (120) days to either pay the amount demanded and the interest due thereon or to give the State Auditor a written response with specific reasons for nonpayment, then the surety shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount of twelve percent (12%) of the bond, not to exceed Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), to be deposited into the State General Fund;

To investigate any alleged or suspected violation of the laws of the state by any officer or employee of the state, county or other public office in the purchase, sale or the use of any supplies, services, equipment or other property belonging thereto; and in such investigation to do any and all things necessary to procure evidence sufficient either to prove or disprove the existence of such alleged or suspected violations. The Department of Investigation of the State Department of Audit may investigate, for the purpose of prosecution, any suspected criminal violation of the provisions of this chapter. For the purpose of administration and enforcement of this chapter, the enforcement employees of the Department of Investigation of the State Department of Audit have the powers of a law enforcement officer of this state, and shall be empowered to make arrests and to serve and execute search warrants and other valid legal process anywhere within the State of Mississippi. All enforcement employees of the Department of Investigation of the State Department of Audit hired on or after July 1, 1993, shall be required to complete the Law Enforcement Officers Training Program and shall meet the standards of the program;

To issue subpoenas, with the approval of, and returnable to, a judge of a chancery or circuit court, in termtime or in vacation, to examine the records, documents or other evidence of persons, firms, corporations or any other entities insofar as such records, documents or other evidence relate to dealings with any state, county or other public entity. The circuit or chancery judge must serve the county in which the records, documents or other evidence is located; or where all or part of the transaction or transactions occurred which are the subject of the subpoena;

In any instances in which the State Auditor is or shall be authorized or required to examine or audit, whether preaudit or postaudit, any books, ledgers, accounts or other records of the affairs of any public hospital owned or owned and operated by one or more political subdivisions or parts thereof or any combination thereof, or any school district, including activity funds thereof, it shall be sufficient compliance therewith, in the discretion of the State Auditor, that such examination or audit be made from the report of any audit or other examination certified by a certified public accountant and prepared by or under the supervision of such certified public accountant. Such audits shall be made in accordance with generally accepted standards of auditing, with the use of an audit program prepared by the State Auditor, and final reports of such audits shall conform to the format prescribed by the State Auditor. All files, working papers, notes, correspondence and all other data compiled during the course of the audit shall be available, without cost, to the State Auditor for examination and abstracting during the normal business hours of any business day. The expense of such certified reports shall be borne by the respective hospital, or any available school district funds other than minimum program funds, subject to examination or audit. The State Auditor shall not be bound by such certified reports and may, in his or their discretion, conduct such examination or audit from the books, ledgers, accounts or other records involved as may be appropriate and authorized by law;

The State Auditor shall have the authority to contract with qualified public accounting firms to perform selected audits required in paragraphs (d), (e), (f) and (j) of this section, if funds are made available for such contracts by the Legislature, or if funds are available from the governmental entity covered by paragraphs (d), (e), (f) and (j). Such audits shall be made in accordance with generally accepted standards of auditing. All files, working papers, notes, correspondence and all other data compiled during the course of the audit shall be available, without cost, to the State Auditor for examination and abstracting during the normal business hours of any business day;

The State Auditor shall have the authority to establish training courses and programs for the personnel of the various state and local governmental entities under the jurisdiction of the Office of the State Auditor. The training courses and programs shall include, but not be limited to, topics on internal control of funds, property and equipment control and inventory, governmental accounting and financial reporting, and internal auditing. The State Auditor is authorized to charge a fee from the participants of these courses and programs, which fee shall be deposited into the Department of Audit Special Fund. State and local governmental entities are authorized to pay such fee and any travel expenses out of their general funds or any other available funds from which such payment is not prohibited by law;

Upon written request by the Governor or any member of the State Legislature, the State Auditor may audit any state funds and/or state and federal funds received by any nonprofit corporation incorporated under the laws of this state;

To conduct performance audits of personal or professional service contracts by state agencies on a random sampling basis, or upon request of the State Personal Service Contract Review Board under Section 25-9-120(3);

At the discretion of the State Auditor, the Auditor may conduct risk assessments, as well as performance and compliance audits based on Generally Accepted Government Auditing Standards (GAGAS) of any state-funded economic development program authorized under Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972. After risk assessments or program audits, the State Auditor may conduct audits of those projects deemed high-risk, specifically as they identify any potential wrongdoing or noncompliance based on objectives of the economic development program. The Auditor is granted authority to gather, audit and review data and information from the Mississippi Development Authority or any of its agents, the Department of Revenue, and when necessary under this paragraph, the recipient business or businesses or any other private, public or nonprofit entity with information relevant to the audit project. The maximum amount the State Auditor may bill the oversight agency under this paragraph in any fiscal year is One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), based on reasonable and necessary expenses;

To review and approve any independent auditor selected by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation in accordance with Section 27-115-89, to conduct an annual audit of the corporation; and

To conduct audits or investigations of the Mississippi Lottery Corporation if in the opinion of the State Auditor conditions justify such audits or investigations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 5; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 5; Laws, 1960, ch. 375; Laws, 1968, ch. 496, § 1, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 512, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 466, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 450; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 2; Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 427, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 33; Laws, 1994, ch. 332, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 336, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 609, § 6; Laws, 2003, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 461, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 562, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 516, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 538, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 567, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 425, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2014; Laws, 2018, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 47, eff from and after September 1, 2018.

§ 7-7-213.
Payment of costs of audits and other services.

The costs of audits and other services required by Sections 7-7-201 through 7-7-215, except for those audits and services authorized by Section 7-7-211(k) which shall be funded by appropriations made by the Legislature from such funds as it deems appropriate, shall be paid from a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury, to be known as the State Department of Audit Fund, into which will be paid each year the amounts received for performing audits required by law. Except for any municipality required under this chapter to be audited by the State Auditor, the amounts to be charged for performing audits and other services shall be the actual cost, not to exceed Thirty-five Dollars ($35.00) per man hour plus the actual cost of any independent specialist firm contracted by the State Auditor to assist in the performance of the audit. Costs paid for independent specialists or firms contracted by the State Auditor shall be paid by the audited entity through the State Auditor to the specialist or firm conducting the audit. In the event of failure by any unit of government to pay the charges authorized herein, the Department of Audit shall notify the State Fiscal Officer, and upon a determination that the charges are substantially correct, the State Fiscal Officer shall notify the defaulting unit of his determination. If payment is not made within thirty (30) days after such notification, the State Fiscal Officer shall notify the State Treasurer and Department of Public Accounts that no further warrants are to be issued to the defaulting unit until the deficiency is paid.

The cost of any service by the department not required of it under the provisions of the cited sections but made necessary by the willful fault or negligence of an officer or employee of any public office of the state shall be recovered (i) from such officer or employee and/or surety on official bond thereof and/or (ii) from the individual, partnership, corporation or association involved, in the same manner and under the same terms, when necessary, as provided the department for recovering public funds in Section 7-7-211.

The State Auditor shall deliver a copy of any audit of the fiscal and financial affairs of a county to the chancery clerk of such county and shall deliver a notice stating that a copy of such audit is on file in the chancery clerk’s office to some newspaper published in the county to be published. If no newspaper is published in the county, a copy of such notice shall be delivered to a newspaper having a general circulation therein.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 6; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 6; Laws, 1979, ch. 512, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 123; Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 3; Laws, 1989, ch. 459, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 532, § 34; Laws, 2008, ch. 558, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 567, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 520, § 2; Laws, 2014, ch. 425, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 7-7-214.
Payment of costs of audits by governmental entities which receive reimbursement from federal government; disposition of amounts collected.

This section shall apply only to single audits of federal and state funds of governmental entities conducted by the department pursuant to the Single Audit Act of 1984. Notwithstanding any provision of Section 7-7-213 to the contrary, the State Auditor is authorized to charge governmental entities the entire audit cost for which such entities may receive reimbursement from the federal government for the cost of that portion of the single audit that covers the audit requirements associated with federal funds. The costs collected by the department under this section shall be deposited into the State Department of Audit special fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).

§ 7-7-215.
Reports; applicability of generally accepted auditing standards; retention of audit materials; access to records of entities subject to audit.

Upon the completion of each audit, the department shall prepare a report which shall set forth the facts of such audit in the most comprehensive form, and the original copy of such report shall be filed in the office to which it pertains, as a permanent record; one (1) copy thereof shall be filed in the office of the department, subject to public inspection, and one (1) copy shall be preserved for use by the Governor and/or the Legislature. Other provisions notwithstanding, all work papers associated with an audit shall be confidential, but available to subsequent auditors engaged in performing the entities’ subsequent audit. The director shall require such financial reports from every public office and taxing body as he may deem necessary and for such period as he may designate, and at the end of each fiscal year the State Auditor and director shall prepare and publish a report of comparative financial statistics covering all public offices of the state over which the department has accounting and auditing supervision. The Governor may direct the State Auditor and/or the director of the department to make any special report on any subject under their jurisdiction and make any special audit or investigation he may desire, such directives to be issued in writing.

All audits conducted by the department shall be in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards, as promulgated by nationally recognized professional organizations. Audit and investigative reports, work papers and other evidence and related supportive material shall be retained and filed according to an agreement between the State Auditor and the Department of Archives and History. In conducting audits pursuant to this article, the department shall have access to all records, documents, books, papers and other evidence relating to the financial transactions of any governmental entity subject to audit by the department.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-07; Laws, 1948, ch. 202, § 7; Laws, 1952, ch. 176, § 7; Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 5; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 2009).

§ 7-7-216.
Independent audit of office of State Auditor.

No less than once during each four-year term of the State Auditor, the Legislature shall receive bids from an independent, certified public accounting firm for an opinion and a legal compliance audit of the Office of the State Auditor. Such firm, so selected, shall report its findings and recommendations to the Legislature and the Governor. The cost of this audit shall be paid from funds appropriated for this purpose by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 499, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1986).

§ 7-7-217.
Record of exceptions taken as result of audits.

The state auditor, as ex-officio head of the state department of audit, shall maintain a continuing record of exceptions taken as a result of any and all audits made by the state department of audit, which shall show the name of the state department, agency, or subdivision audited, the date or approximate date when each exception was taken, a brief description of such exception, the immediate steps taken to effect correction or restitution, any subsequent actions taken or recommended to be taken, and the final disposition of such exceptions when such disposition occurs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-11; Laws, 1970, ch. 462, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 7-7-218.
Preparation of report by State Auditor where public officer or employee fails or refuses to make report; correction and publication of finding of substantial noncompliance where public officer or employee fails to correct finding; payment of expenses.

If any officer or employee of the state or subdivision shall refuse or fail to make any report to the department, the State Auditor shall proceed to make the report or cause the report to be made. The expense for such report shall be personally borne by said officer or employee, and he or she shall be responsible for the payment of the expense incurred.

If any officer or employee of a state agency or political subdivision refuses or fails to correct any audit finding of substantial noncompliance that has existed for three (3) consecutive years, the State Auditor shall proceed to cause the finding to be made in compliance and publish the findings and action. The expense for such correction and publication of a finding of substantial noncompliance shall be borne by the state agency or political subdivision involved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 488, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 317, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2002.

§ 7-7-219.
Report of exceptions to legislative committee.

A report of exceptions taken by the auditor shall be made by the state auditor to the general legislative investigating committee, or any standing committee of the legislature that may request such reports, and any legislator who may request such reports. Said reports shall be furnished within thirty (30) days after the close of each fiscal year, said report to list all exceptions taken within that fiscal year and exceptions previously taken in which no final disposition has been made. The said report shall summarize each exception listed and provide information appearing on the record referred to in Section 7-7-217.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3877-12; Laws, 1970, ch. 462, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 1970).

§ 7-7-221.
Publication of synopsis of county audit report.

As soon as possible after an annual audit of the fiscal and financial affairs of a county by the State Auditor, as the head of the State Department of Audit, has been made and a copy of such report of audit or examination has been filed with the board of supervisors of such county and the clerk thereof, as required in Section 7-7-215, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall publish a synopsis of such report in a form prescribed by the State Auditor.

The clerk of the board of supervisors shall deliver a copy of the aforesaid synopsis to some newspaper published in the county, and, if no newspaper is published in the county, then to a newspaper having a general circulation therein, to be published.

The cost of publishing the aforesaid synopsis by some newspaper in a county or by some newspaper having a general circulation therein, as hereinbefore provided, shall be paid for out of the general fund of the county upon a detailed itemized statement thereof being furnished to the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county by the publisher of the newspaper, accompanied by one (1) copy of the proof of publication thereof. The cost of such publication shall be based on the rate now fixed by law for publishing legal notices, and it shall be mandatory upon the board of supervisors of the county and the clerk thereof to pay such costs out of the county general fund.

The clerk shall forward a copy of the published synopsis to the State Auditor within sixty (60) days of its publication. If the synopsis does not substantially satisfy the requirements of this section, the State Auditor is authorized to prepare the synopsis and have it published in accordance with this section at cost to the county.

HISTORY:
Former §7-7-221 [Codes, 1942, § 3877-10; Laws, 1948, ch. 426, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1958, ch. 332, §§ 2-5] repealed by Laws, 1979, ch. 512, § 5. New §7-7-221 enacted by Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 12; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 5; Laws, 1996, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1996.

§ 7-7-223.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 455, § 14, eff from and after March 29, 1985.

§7-7-223. [Codes, 1942, § 3884; Laws, 1938, ch. 157]

§ 7-7-225.
Contract for legal services.

The State Auditor, when conducting agency audits, shall test to determine whether or not the state institutions of higher learning and any state agency which does not draw warrants on the Treasury have either received approval of the Attorney General or complied with the provisions of Section 7-5-39, with regard to any contract for legal services.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1991, ch. 473 § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 546, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2012.